Mississippi, session 2026, HB4081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to Access Training, Inc., in Jackson for the purpose of providing financial assistance for students that are training there, as provided in Section 2 of this act, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027...............................................$375,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be used by Access Training, Inc., to provide financial assistance for students that are training there, as follows: (a)  Paying full or partial tuition and fees for students training and stipends to support students during training; (b)  Funding mentorship initiatives that connect trainees with established professionals, promoting knowledge transfer and community engagement; and (c)  Financing continuing education for current healthcare providers to encourage specialization in areas most needed in a community. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.